District of Columbia statutes.
25-423

Posted notice required after submission of application and for the duration of the protest period.

(a)

The applicant shall post 2 notices, furnished by ABRA, of the application in conspicuous places on the outside of the establishment for the duration of the protest period.

(b)

The notices shall state:

(1)

The information required by § 25-421(b);

(2)

The final day of the protest period;

(3)

The date, time, and place of the administrative review; and

(4)

The telephone number and mailing address of ABRA.

(c)

Any person wilfully removing, obliterating, or defacing the notices shall be guilty of a violation of this chapter.

(d)

An applicant who fails to maintain the posted notices continuously during the protest period shall be guilty of a violation of this chapter.

(e)

If the Board determines that the notices posted at an applicant’s establishment have not remained visible to the public for a full 45 days, the Board shall require the reposting of the notices and shall reschedule the administrative review for a date at least 45 days after the originally scheduled review, unless the applicant has fully performed all other notice requirements and the Board determines that it is in the best interests, of the parties to proceed at an earlier date.

(f)

The requirements of this section shall not apply to applicants for a solicitor’s license, manager’s license, caterer’s license, or a temporary license.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 201(f), 51 DCR 6525

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-402 and § 25-403.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-423.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187 added subsec. (f).